dictionaries/fr_FR-reformed/fr_FR-reformed.aff
FLAG long
SFX q+ Y 32
SFX q+ enir enu/41 enir 24
SFX q+ enir enus/41 enir 25
SFX q+ enir enue/41 enir 26
SFX q+ enir enues/41 enir 27
SFX q+ tir ti/41 tir 24
SFX q+ tir tis/41 tir 25
SFX q+ tir tie/41 tir 26
SFX q+ tir ties/41 tir 27
SFX q+ courir couru/41 courir 24
SFX q+ courir courus/41 courir 25
SFX q+ courir courue/41 courir 26
SFX q+ courir courues/41 courir 27
SFX q+ ivre écu vivre 24
SFX q+ ivre écus vivre 25
SFX q+ ivre écue vivre 26
SFX q+ ivre écues vivre 27
SFX q+ aire u aire 24
SFX q+ aire us aire 25
SFX q+ aire ue aire 26
SFX q+ aire ues aire 27
SFX q+ dre du dre 24
SFX q+ dre dus dre 25
SFX q+ dre due dre 26
SFX q+ dre dues dre 27
SFX q+ valoir valu .valoir 24
SFX q+ valoir valus .valoir 25
SFX q+ valoir value .valoir 26
SFX q+ valoir values .valoir 27
SFX q+ aitre u/41 aitre 24
SFX q+ aitre us/41 aitre 25
SFX q+ aitre ue/41 aitre 26
SFX q+ aitre ues/41 aitre 27

SFX q. Y 8
SFX q. enir enu/41 enir 74
SFX q. tir ti/41 tir 74
SFX q. courir couru/41 courir 74
SFX q. ivre écu vivre 74
SFX q. aire u aire 74
SFX q. dre du dre 74
SFX q. valoir valu/41 .valoir 74
SFX q. aitre u/41 aitre 74
